test/src/morphology/N-kala_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - kalā: # nouns '(eng) fish / (fin) kala' 
    kalā+N+Sg+Nom: kalā
    kalā+N+Sg+Gen: kalā
    kalā+N+Sg+Par: ka’llõ   # ka'llõ
    kalā+N+Pl+Dat: kalān
    kalā+N+Sg+Instr: kalāks
    kalā+N+Sg+Ill: ka’llõ   # ka'llõ
    kalā+N+Sg+Ela: kalāst
    kalā+N+Pl+Nom: kalād
    kalā+N+Pl+Gen: kalād
    kalā+N+Pl+Par: ka’ļḑi
    kalā+N+Pl+Dat: kalādõn
    kalā+N+Pl+Instr: kalādõks
    kalā+N+Pl+Ill: ka’ļži  # ka'ļži
    kalā+N+Pl+Ela: ka’ļšti # ka'ļšti
